Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-410 Subordination of claims for
noncooperation. If an ancillary receiver in another state or foreign
country, whether called an ancillary receiver or not, fails to transfer to the
domiciliary liquidator in this State any assets within the ancillary receiver's
control other than special deposits, diminished only by the expenses of the
ancillary receivership, if any, then the claims filed in the ancillary
receivership, or with the guaranty fund or association in that jurisdiction,
other than special deposit claims or secured claims, shall be placed in the
class of claims under section 431:15-332(8). [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
2004, c 122, §72]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next